Tennessee statutes. Title 34 Guardianship
Chapter 7

Public Guardianship for the Elderly

34-7-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Public Guardianship for the Elderly Law.”

Acts 1986, ch. 895, § 1.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1986, 54 Tenn. L. Rev. 457 (1987).

To Be or Not To Be in Tennessee: Deciding Surrogate Issues, 34 U. Mem. L. Rev. 333 (2004).

34-7-102. Legislative intent — Construction.

The general assembly recognizes that many elderly persons in the state are unable to meet essential requirements for their physical health or to manage essential aspects of their financial resources. The general assembly finds that private conservatorship is inadequate where there are no willing and responsible family members or friends to serve as conservator and where the disabled person does not have adequate resources for the compensation of a private conservator, or to pay legal and court costs. The general assembly intends through this chapter to establish a statewide public conservatorship program to aid disabled persons who are sixty (60) years of age or older who have no family member or friend who is willing and able to serve as conservator.

The general assembly intends to promote the general welfare by establishing a public guardianship system that permits the disabled elderly to determinatively participate as fully as possible in all decisions that affect them, that assists such persons to regain or develop their capacities to the maximum extent possible, and that accomplishes such objectives through the use of the least intrusive alternatives. This chapter shall be liberally construed to accomplish these purposes. It is the intent of the general assembly that nothing contained in this chapter will affect the powers of the court under chapters 1, 2 and 3 of this title, nor create additional powers not contained in chapters 1, 2 and 3 of this title. The district public guardian shall not serve in more than one (1) capacity in any one (1) proceeding under chapters 1, 2 and 3 of this title.

Acts 1986, ch. 895, § 2; 1994, ch. 679, §§ 1, 2.

34-7-103. Creation and administration of statewide program.

A statewide program to provide guardianship for the elderly is created and will be administered by the commission on aging, which shall adopt policies and may promulgate rules to govern the operation of district public guardians within each development district, and implement the law. The commission shall provide a coordinator to monitor program development and operation, and shall contract with the grantee agencies in each of the nine (9) development districts which are the planning and service areas designated by the commission. Each grantee agency in the nine (9) development districts shall hire staff to serve as district public guardian in the planning and service area.

Acts 1986, ch. 895, § 3; 1987, ch. 333, § 1.

34-7-104. Powers and duties of district public guardian.

The duties and powers of the district public guardian are as follows:

To serve as conservator for disabled persons who are sixty (60) years of age or older who have no family members or other person, bank or corporation willing and able to serve as conservator;

The district public guardian does not have any power or authority beyond that set forth for a conservator in chapters 1, 2 and 3 of this title; and

To provide for the least intrusive alternatives, the district public guardian may accept power of attorney.

The district public guardian may employ sufficient staff to carry out the duties of the office.

The district public guardian may delegate to staff members the powers and duties of the office of district public guardian except as otherwise limited by law. The district public guardian retains ultimate responsibility for the discharge of required duties and responsibilities.

A district public guardian may accept the services of volunteer persons and organizations, and raise money to supplement operating costs.

The commission on aging, in consultation with the departments of human services and health, may develop and implement a statewide program to recruit, train, assign, supervise and evaluate volunteer persons to assist district public guardians in maintaining the independence and dignity of their elderly wards. In developing and implementing this statewide program, the commission on aging shall solicit input and resources from interested organizations, including, but not necessarily limited to, community senior citizen centers, churches and synagogues having senior projects and programs under the auspices of the American Association of Retired Persons. Each volunteer shall possess demonstrated personal characteristics of honesty, integrity, compassion and caring for the elderly. The background of each volunteer shall be subject to appropriate inquiry and investigation. Volunteers shall receive no salary but may be reimbursed by the commission on aging for travel and other expenses incurred directly as a result of the performance of volunteer services.

If the disabled person qualifies for SSI benefits, no charge will be made against the disabled person's estate for court costs or fees of any kind. Under no circumstances may court costs be assessed to the public guardianship program.

If the disabled person does not qualify for SSI benefits, costs and compensation of the district public guardian shall be determined under §§ 34-1-112 and 34-1-114.

All funds received on behalf of a disabled person by the district public guardianship program shall be handled under a computerized accounting package approved by the commission on aging, and shall be audited annually by the state.

All other assets received by the district public guardian shall be handled in accordance with state laws, rules and court regulation or regulations as to disposition of property and record keeping.

Upon termination of the conservatorship, all assets remaining in the estate shall be paid over to the disabled person or to the disabled person's legal representative.

While performing conservatorship duties, the district public conservator shall continue to seek a family member, friend, other person, bank or corporation qualified and willing to serve as conservator. If such an individual, bank or corporation is located, the district public conservator shall submit a motion to the court for appointment of the qualified and willing successor conservator.

A person appointed successor district public guardian immediately succeeds to all rights, duties, responsibilities and powers of the preceding district public guardian.

When the position of district public guardian is vacant, subordinate personnel employed under subsection (c) shall continue to act as if the position of district public guardian were filled.

A district public guardian shall be required to post bond in individual cases in accordance with § 34-1-105. The commission on aging shall arrange out of the program budget to purchase a statewide bond that shall ensure the fiduciary responsibilities of the district public guardian in all court appointed cases.

The district public guardian shall adhere to all state laws that are applicable to conservatorship.

To ensure adequate services for each disabled person, the district public guardian shall submit certification to the court when maximum caseload has been attained, and the court shall not assign additional disabled persons while maximum caseload is maintained. Maximum caseload shall be certified by the commission on aging upon review of verifying documentation submitted by the district public guardian and the grantee agency director. The district public guardian must notify the court when caseload has been reduced to less than maximum load.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) to the contrary, the executive director of the Tennessee commission on aging and disability may request the district public guardian to serve as a conservator for disabled persons who are younger than sixty (60) years of age if the following conditions are met:

The request is made through a court; and

The court has found on the record that:

There are no other less intrusive alternatives available for the disabled person; and

The disabled person has no family members or other person, bank, or corporation willing and able to serve as conservator.

Should the district public guardian take on the responsibilities of a guardian for a disabled person pursuant to subdivision (n)(1), the guardian must adhere, in performing the guardian's duty, to all provisions of this chapter and to all applicable state laws.

Acts 1986, ch. 895, § 4; 1987, ch. 333, §§ 2-8; 1994, ch. 679, §§ 3-16; 1997, ch. 327, § 1; 2019, ch. 230, § 1.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment added (n).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 230, § 2. April 30, 2019.

Attorney General Opinions. Duties and liabilities of district public guardian. OAG 13-36, 2013 Tenn. AG LEXIS 37 (5/2/13).

34-7-105. Costs of public guardianship.

Costs of public guardianship for the elderly will be met by annual appropriation to the commission on aging.

Acts 1986, ch. 895, § 5.